test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-laaha_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:



  Noun - laahâ: # â-stems
    laahâ+N+Sg+Nom: laaḥâ
    laahâ+N+Sg+Gen: laaṿâ
    laahâ+N+Sg+Acc: laaṿâ
    laahâ+N+Sg+Ill: laaḥân
    laahâ+N+Sg+Loc: laaṿâst
    laahâ+N+Sg+Com: lavváin
    laahâ+N+Sg+Abe: laṿâttáá
    laahâ+N+Ess: laahhân
    laahâ+N+Par: laahhâd
    laahâ+N+Pl+Nom: laaṿah
    laahâ+N+Pl+Gen: laaṿâi
    laahâ+N+Pl+Acc: laaṿâid
    laahâ+N+Pl+Ill: lavváid
    laahâ+N+Pl+Loc: laaṿâin
    laahâ+N+Pl+Com: laṿâiguin
    laahâ+N+Pl+Abe: laṿâittáá
